Washington statutes.
RCW 19.76.110

Refilling bottles, etc.—Forbidden.

It is hereby declared to be unlawful for any person or persons hereafter, without the written consent of the owner or owners thereof, to fill with ale, porter, lager beer or soda, mineral water or other beverages, for sale or to be furnished to customers, any such casks, barrels, kegs, bottles or boxes so marked or stamped, or to sell, dispose of, buy or traffic in, or wantonly destroy any such cask, barrel, keg, bottle or box so marked, stamped, by the owner or owners thereof, after such owner or owners shall have complied with the provisions of RCW 19.76.100.

[ 2003 c 53 s 148; 1897 c 38 s 2; RRS s 11547.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Crimes relating to brands and marks: Chapter 9.16 RCW.